Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1545
Recycling, defined.

Recycling shall mean the process of separating, cleaning, treating, and reconstituting waste or other discarded materials for the purpose of recovering and reusing the resources contained therein.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 12.
September 30, 2025